District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Certified Business Enterprise Program Compliance and Enforcement
Support Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of
2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.01 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 2302 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.02) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (7) is amended to read as follows:
“(7) “Economically disadvantaged individual” means an individual who owns at
least a 51% interest in a business enterprise and whose personal net worth does not exceed the
limits set by the United States Department of Transportation, pursuant to 49 C.F.R. § 26.68.”.
(2) Paragraph (8A) is amended to read as follows:
“(8A) “Equity impact enterprise” means a business enterprise that is a resident-
owned business, small business enterprise, and disadvantaged business enterprise.”.
(3) Paragraph (9) is redesignated as paragraph (8B).
(4) A new paragraph (9) is added to read as follows:
“(9) “Formal complaint” means a complaint that is submitted to the Department in
writing, sworn to by the complainant, and notarized.”.
(5) A new paragraph (10A) is added to read as follows:
“(10A) “Informal complaint” means a complaint other than a formal complaint
and includes complaints submitted in person, by email, by telephone, or through the
Department’s complaint hotline.”.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(6) A new paragraph (10B) is added to read as follows:
“(10B) “Independently owned and operated” means that the business enterprise
manages and controls its day-to-day operations without being subject to control, restriction,
modification, or limitation by another business enterprise or not-for-profit business that has an
ownership or other financial interest in the business enterprise.”.
(7) A new paragraph (13A-i) is added to read as follows:
“(13A-i) “Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, general
partner of a partnership, limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership, foreign
limited liability partnership, association, corporation, unincorporated business, company,
syndicate, estate, trust, business trust, trustee, trustee in bankruptcy, receiver, executor,
administrator, assignee, fiduciary, or entity of any kind.”.
(b) Section 2331 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.31) is amended by adding a new paragraph
(1A) to read as follows:
“(1A)(A) Is:
“(i) Independently owned and operated;
“(ii) More than 50% owned, operated, and controlled by a District-
based enterprise or not-for-profit business; or
“(iii) Owned by a non-District-based business enterprise that is
more than 50% owned by District residents;”.
(c) Section 2346(b)(2)(A) (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.46(b)(2)(A)) is amended by
striking the phrase “the certified business enterprise perform at least 50% of the contracting
effort with its own organization and resources and, if it subcontracts, 35% of the subcontracted
effort shall be with certified business enterprises.” and inserting the phrase “each certified
business enterprise holding a majority or minority interest in the certified joint venture shall,
with its own organization and resources, perform a percentage of the work equal to or greater
than its percentage interest in the joint venture, and, if the certified joint venture subcontracts, at
least 35% of the subcontracted effort shall be with certified business enterprises.” in its place.
(d) Section 2363 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.63) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “, in accordance with
procedures set forth in subsection (e) of this section, that” and inserting the word “that” in its
place.
(2) Subsection (e) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) are amended to read as follows:
“(e)(1)(A) Any person may file with the Department a formal or informal complaint
alleging a violation of this act.
“(B) The Department shall maintain a hotline for the filing of informal
complaints.
“(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Department shall
investigate each formal or informal complaint filed with it.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) The Department may dismiss a complaint without conducting an
investigation if the Department determines the complaint is frivolous or otherwise without merit.
If the Department dismisses a formal complaint as frivolous or otherwise without merit, the
Department shall prepare a report that includes:
“(A) A statement detailing the formal complaint, including the name,
address, and telephone number of the person filing the complaint;
“(B) The name of the person or certified joint venture alleged to be in
violation of this act;
“(C) The facts and law considered in rendering the determination; and
“(D) Any other information considered in rendering the determination.”.
(B) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
(C) New paragraphs (5) and (6) are added to read as follows:
“(5) After the completion of an investigation conducted pursuant to this
subsection, the Department shall take such enforcement action, if any, it deems appropriate.
“(6) The Department shall maintain a record listing all formal complaints, which
shall contain:
“(A) The name of the person alleged to be in violation of this act;
“(B) The date the formal complaint was made to the Department; and
“(C) A description of the formal complaint.”.
(3) Subsection (g) is amended to read as follows:
“(g)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of this subsection, before issuing a civil
penalty to, or denying, suspending, changing, or revoking a certification, a person or a certified
joint venture, the Department shall issue a notice of determination to the person or certified joint
venture. The notice of determination shall describe the:
“(A) Basis for the Department’s determination;
“(B) Proposed penalty, if any; and
“(C) Process and timeline by which the person or certified joint venture
may request a hearing.
“(2) Pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection, a person, or a designated
representative on behalf of a certified joint venture, may request a hearing before the Office of
Administrative Hearings within 10 days after receiving the notice. If the person or certified joint
venture does not request a hearing within that time, the civil penalty, denial, suspension, change,
or revocation shall become final, and the person or certified joint venture shall be deemed to
have waived the opportunity for judicial review.
“(3) If a hearing is requested, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall consider
the matter pursuant to section 19 of the Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Act of
2001, effective March 6, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-76; D.C. Official Code § 2-1831.16), and the rules
issued pursuant to it. The Department shall bear the burden of establishing the violation by a
preponderance of the evidence.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) The Office of Administrative Hearings shall conduct such hearing based on
the record developed by the Department. The decision of the Office of Administrative Hearings
shall be the final administrative decision for the purpose of judicial review.
“(5) Notice of a final suspension or revocation of a certification shall be published
on the Department’s website.
“(6) A business enterprise or joint venture whose certification has been revoked
shall not be eligible to apply for a new certification from the Department until 36 months after
the date that the revocation became final.
“(7)(A) The Department may at any time, upon motion by a business enterprise or
joint venture whose certification has been suspended or revoked, remove the suspension or
reissue a certification if the Department determines that it is in the District government’s interest
to remove the suspension or reissue the certification before the end of the 36-month period and
the removal or reissuance will not endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the general public.
“(B) In determining whether to remove a suspension or reissue a
certification, the Department shall consider whether the business enterprise or joint venture
submitted satisfactory proof that conditions within, or actions by, the business enterprise or joint
venture that led to the suspension or revocation have been corrected.
“(C) A business enterprise or joint venture whose certification is reissued
shall cease to be subject to the 36-month waiting period established in paragraph (6) of this
subsection.
“(8)(A) If, after an investigation, the Department determines that a business
enterprise or joint venture certified under this act has violated any provision of this act in such a
manner as to present an imminent danger to the health, safety, or welfare of any person or the
general public, the Department may summarily suspend the certification of the business
enterprise or joint venture upon issuing the notice of determination described in paragraph (1) of
this subsection.
“(B)(i) The notice of determination shall inform the business enterprise or
joint venture of the reason for the summary suspension and the right to request a hearing before
the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to this subsection.
“(ii) If a business enterprise or joint venture timely requests a
hearing on a summary suspension, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall conduct the
hearing within 14 days after receiving the request, unless a longer period of time is agreed to by
the business enterprise or joint venture, and the Office of Administrative Hearings shall issue a
decision within 14 days after the record of the hearing closes.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
5